zh-TW: 平台式鋼琴響板材質: 雪松; 恩格曼雲杉; 歐洲雲杉; 桃花心木; 西卡雲杉; 雲杉; 其他
lt-LT: Fortepijono rezonansinės plokštės medžiaga: Kedras; Engelmano eglė; Europinė eglė; Raudonmedis; Sitkinė eglė; Eglė; Kita
cs: Materiál rezonanční desky klavíru: Cedr; Smrk Engelmannův; Evropský smrk; Mahagon; Smrk sitka; Smrk; Ostatní
ro-RO: Materialul tablei de rezonanță a pianului cu coadă: Cedru; Molid Engelmann; Molid european; Mahon; Molid Sitka; Molid; Altele
tr: Kuyruklu piyano ses tahtası malzemesi: Sedir; Engelmann ladini; Avrupa ladini; Maun; Sitka ladini; Ladin; Diğer
ja: グランドピアノサウンドボード素材: シダー; イングルマンスプルース; ヨーロピアンスプルース; マホガニー; シトカスプルース; スプルース; その他
nb: Materiale i lydbrett for stort piano: Sedertre; Engelmannsgran; Europeisk gran; Mahogni; Sitkagran; Gran; Annet
fi: Flyygelin kaikupohjan materiaali: Setri; Engelmanninkuusi; Euroopankuusi; Mahonki; Sitkankuusi; Kuusi; Muu
es: Material de la caja de resonancia del piano de cola: Cedro; Pícea de Engelmann; Pícea europea; Caoba; Pícea de Sitka; Pícea; Otro
el: Υλικό ηχητικής πλάκας μεγάλου πιάνου: Κέδρος; Έλατο Engelmann; Ευρωπαϊκό έλατο; Μαόνι; Έλατο Sitka; Έλατο; Άλλο
de: Material des Flügel-Resonanzbodens: Zeder; Engelmann-Fichte; Europäische Fichte; Mahagoni; Sitka-Fichte; Fichte; Andere
ko: 그랜드 피아노 향판 소재: 삼나무; 엥겔만 스프루스; 유로피안 스프루스; 마호가니; 시트카 스프루스; 스프루스; 기타
vi: Chất liệu tấm cộng hưởng âm của đàn đại cầm: Gỗ tuyết tùng; Gỗ vân sam Engelmann; Gỗ vân sam châu Âu; Gỗ gụ; Gỗ vân sam Sitka; Gỗ vân sam; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на резонансната дъска на роял: Кедър; Енгелманов смърч; Европейски смърч; Махагон; Ситкански смърч; Смърч; Други
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำซาวด์บอร์ดของแกรนด์เปียโน: ไม้ซีดาร์; ไม้แองเกิลแมนน์สปรูซ; ไม้ยูโรเปียนสปรูซ; ไม้มะฮอกกานี; ไม้ซิทก้าสปรูซ; ไม้สปรูซ; อื่นๆ
hu: Hangversenyzongora rezonánslapjának anyaga: Cédrus; Engelmann-lucfenyő; Európai lucfenyő; Mahagóni; Sitka lucfenyő; Lucfenyő; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal rezonantne ploče koncertnog klavira: Cedar; Engelmannova smreka; Europska smreka; Mahagonij; Sitka smreka; Smreka; Ostalo
nl: Materiaal van zangbodem van vleugel: Ceder; Engelmann-spar; Europese spar; Mahonie; Sitka-spar; Spar; Anders
it: Materiale della tavola armonica del pianoforte a coda: Cedro; Abete di Engelmann; Abete europeo; Mogano; Abete Sitka; Abete; Altro
sv: Material för pianots resonansbotten: Ceder; Engelmannsgran; Europeisk gran; Mahogny; Sitkagran; Gran; Annat
en: Grand piano soundboard material: Cedar; Engelmann spruce; European spruce; Mahogany; Sitka spruce; Spruce; Other
pt-BR: Material da caixa de ressonância do piano de cauda: Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Abeto europeu; Mogno; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Outro
sl-SI: Material resonančne plošče koncertnega klavirja: Cedra; Engelmannova smreka; Evropska smreka; Mahagonij; Sitkanska smreka; Smreka; Drugo
fr: Matériau de la table d'harmonie d'un piano à queue: Cèdre; Épicéa d’Engelmann; Épicéa européen; Acajou; Épicéa de Sitka; Épicéa; Autre
pl: Materiał płyty rezonansowej fortepianu: Cedr; Świerk Engelmanna; Świerk europejski; Mahoń; Świerk sitkajski; Świerk; Inny
zh-CN: 三角钢琴音板材质: 雪松木; 恩格尔曼云杉木; 欧洲云杉木; 桃花心木; 西加云杉木; 云杉木; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál rezonančnej dosky koncertného krídla: Céder; Smrek Engelmannov; Smrek obyčajný; Mahagón; Smrek sitkanský; Smrek; Iné
ru: Материал деки рояля: Кедр; Ель Энгельмана; Европейская ель; Махагони; Ситхинская ель; Ель; Другое
da: Materiale for flygels klangbund: Ceder; Engelmann-gran; Europæisk gran; Mahogni; Sitkagran; Gran; Andet
pt-PT: Material da caixa de ressonância do piano de cauda: Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Abeto europeu; Mogno; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Outro